src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/cs.xml
p?e3h
p?e3j
p?e3t4
p?e3z
p?e3?2
p?i3
p?ih4
2pš
pš4ti
2p?
qu2
2r.
1ra.
ra4br
ra4em
ra4es
ra4ff
ra4hl
ra4hm
ra4jg
ra4jš
2rak
ra4nh
ra3si
rast4r
ra4vv
ra4wl
ra4y.
ra4yo
ra4?m
4raži
r1b
r2bl
r1c
rca3
r3cha
r3cho
rc4ki
r1d
r4dla
rdo2s
re4ad
re4au
red4r
re4et
re3kl
re3kvi
re4mr
re2sb
res3l
retis4
ret4r
re4um
r1ha
r3hl.
rh3n
r1ho
r3hu
r1há
ri4bb
1ric
ric4ku
ri4dg
ri4dr
ri4fl
ri4gh
ri4zm
2rk
r2kl
r1l
2r1m
r4mio
2rn
rna4vš
rn4dr
ro4ad
ro3by
rod2l
ro3d4r
3rofy
ro3h
ro4h.
ro4jb
ro4kš
rom3n
romy4s
ropát4
ro2sb
ro4skv
ro4sky
ro3sv
ro3ti
ro3tl
ro4t?
ro3vd
rov?4t
3rový
roz3d
roz3n
ro4zo
roz3v
ro3zá
ro4?p
rpa3d
2rr
rr4ha
rr4ho
2r1s
r2st
r4stu
rs3tv?
rs3tvý
2r1t
r2th
r4trá
rt4sm
rtu3
r2t3v
rt4zu
1ru.
ru3se
ru3si
rus3k
ru3ži
3rvaní
r1x
1ry.
rych3
ryd2
rys3ky
rys3t
ry4zk
ry4zn
ry4í.
ry4šk
2rz
rz3d
rz3l
rád4l
rá4dž
1rák
rá3ri
1rá?
r1?
4r?itý.
r?3t
3ré.
2ró
2rš
rš4ní
r?4m.
r?s3ta
r?4v.
3rý.
rý4zn
2s.
sa4pf
sa4pr
sas3k
s2b2
s2c
s3ca
s3ce.
sch2
sch4l
sch4n
3schop
s3ci
sci4e
s3cí
s2d
1se
se4au
se3h
se4ig
se4il
sej4m
se4ku
3sel
se3lh
3sem
ser4va
se3s2
ses4k
se4ss
se4stra
se4stru
se4st?
set2
se3tk
se3t?
se4ur
se3z
se3?t
2sf
s3fo
3sfé
s3fú
1si
3sic
3sif
si4fl
sig4no
3sik
si3ste
3sit
s2j
s3ju
s2k
4skac
s4kak
4skam
s4kok
2skon
skos4
4skot
sk4ra
sk4ru
sk4ry
4skve
sk4vo
s3kán
s3k?
3sl.
4s3la.
s4lav
s3le.
s4led
s3lem
s3len
s3let
s4lib
s4li?i
3sln
4s3lo.
s2ly
s3ly.
s1lí
s2ma
s4mek
s2mo
2sn
s2na
s3nat
s2ne
s3ne.
sn4tl
s2ná
s3ná.
s4níd
1so
sob4l
so3br
so4sk
so4tv
sou3h
sou3s
souz4
so4šk
s2p
s4pol
spro4s
1sr
2ss
ss4sr
2st.
4sta.
s3taj
s2tan
st4at
4stec
s4tep
st4er
s4tero
s4tich
2stil
s4tink
4stit.
4sti?
st3lo
2stn
4sto.
s4tona
4stou.
4str.
4stram
s4trik
4strn
4strác
4stupni
s2tv
st4ve
3ství
4sty.
s4tyl
3styš
s2tá
4stá.
s3tá?
4st?.
s4t?d
3st?h
s2t?r
s2t?ž
s1tí
2stí.
s3t?ej
1su
su4ba
su4bo
suma4
su3ve
s2v
sy3c
sych3r
sy4nes
sá2d
3sáh
sá2kl
2s2?
s3?i
1sé
1sí
2s?
2s?
s3?o
1s?
s2ž
2t.
1ta.
ta2bl
tac4tvo
t2a3d
1taj
ta4jf
ta4jg
4talt
4tand
3tan?
t1ao
2tark
tast4
ta3str
ta4?k
2t1b
2t1c
1te
3te.
te4ak
te4fl
te4in
4teném
teob4
tep3l
ters4
tes3ta
te4tr
te4uc
te4ur
te4ut
2tf
2tg
1ti
ti4gr
2tih
ti3kl
tin4g
ti4pl
ti3sl
tis4tr
ti4tr
2titu
tiz4r
4tizí
tiú3
2tiž
2tk2
t4kal
4t2kan
t4kat
t2kl
tk4la
tk4li
4tkn?
t2ká
2tl
3tl.
4tla.
t1le
tles3
3tlm
t3lo.
t4lou
tlu3
tlu4s
t1ly
t1lé
2tm
t2ma
2tn
t3ní
1to
to4as
to3b
tob4l
to3dr
to4hm
to4ir
2toj
tol4s
to4ol
4top.
4topt
4topu
2torn
2toup
2tp
t3rant
t4rea
t4ref
tre4t
4tric.
trip4
t4rit
t4rog
t3rol
tro4sk
t4rou
4trouh
4tro?.
4trun
t4rus
4t4ruž
t3ráln
4tráš
2tr?
t3r?m
t3r?v
2trý
2t1s
ts4ko
ts2t
2t1t
tt4ch
tt4ri
1tu.
tu4ff
1tuj
tu4lk
2tup
tu4r.
tu3ry
tu4s.
tu4?.
tu3ži
t2v
2tve
2t3vi
t4vinn
t4viš
t4výc
1ty.
ty4g?
ty2la
ty4?e
ty4?h
ty4?j
ty4?o
ty4?r
ty4?ú
3tá.
tá4fl
t2?
t3?i
2t?í
1té
té2bl
3tém
1t?
t?3d4l
2t?h
2t?nn
2t?p
1tíc
4tíc.
4tíce
1tím
2tín
2tír
2t?
t4?eb
t?eh3n
t2?el
t2?ic
t3?il
t?4ti
t1?u
t2?á
3t?áb
t?í4s
2tš
t3št
tš4ti
1t?
1tý.
1tým
1tý?
3týš
u1
2u.
u2at
u2b
u3ba
u3be
u3bi
u3bo
ubs4t
u3bu
u3bá
u3bí.
u3b?
uc4tí
2u2d
u3de
u3di
u3do
u3dru
u3du
u3dy
u3dí
ue4fa
2uf
u2hl
uh3lá
uh3no
u2in
u2jm
u2k
u3ka.
uk4aj
uk4al
uk4at
u3ke
uk3la
uk3le
u3ko
u3ku
u3ky
uk4á.
u3k?
ul4fa
ul1h
ul4pí
u2m
u3ma
u3me
u3mi
um4pl
um4ru
u3mu
u3má
3um?
u2n
un4dl
u3ne
u3no
u3nu
u3n?
u3ní
u3n?
un4žr
u2p
u3pa
u3pe
upe2r3
u3pi
u3pln
u3pu
u3py
u3pá
u3p?
u3pí
u3p?
u2r
u3ra
u3re
u3ri
2u3ro
u3ru
u3ry.
u3rá
1ur?
u3r?
u2s
us3ky
us3ká
us3ké
us3ký
us1l
us2lo
u3so
u4ste
u4sty
u4sté
u4st?
u3st?
u4stš
u4stý
u3su.
u3sy
u3sá
u3sí
u3s?
u4tro
u4trá
u2v
u3vi
u3vu
u2z
u3ze
u3zi
uz1l
u3zo
u3zu
u3zí
u2?
u3?a
u3?e
u3?i
u3?o
u?3t
u3?u
u3?á
u3?í
u2?
u2?
u2š
u3še
u3ši
uš4kl
u3šo
uš3tí
u3šu
u3šá
u3ší
u2ž
u3že
u3žo
u3žu
u3žá
u3ží
1v
2v.
va3dl
va4j?
va4kl
2v1b
2v1c
v2ch
2v2d
v4dal
v3di
v4d?k
v4d??
ve3dle
ve3jd
3ven
ve2p
ve3ps
vep3?
ves3l
ve4sm
ves4p
ve3sta
ve3t4?
ve2z3m
vi4ch
vide2
vi4dr
vi4et
vi4kr
vi2tr
2vk
v2kr
v2l
2v3la.
4vle.
4vlem
2vlo
2vm
2vn
v4nad
vo3b
vo4ic
vo4ja
vo4jb
vo4jd
vo4jj
vo4jm
vo4j?
vo2s
vo4t?
vou3
vous2
v2p
vr2c
vr2dl
4vrny
v1ro
vr4st
vrst3v
vrs4tv?
2vs2
v1sk
v3stv
2v2t
vy3c
vy3d2
vy4dra
vyp2
vy3s2
vy4sn
vys4t
vy3t
vy3?
vy?4k
vyš2
vy4š.
vy4šm
vy4šš
vy4žl
v2z2
vz4no
vz4né
vz4n?
vz4ní
vá3ri
2v2?
v3?á
v3?í
v4?ír
v?4cm
v?3t4a
více3
ví4hat
3vín
2v?
2v?í
v3?ín
v2š2
vše3s
v3ští.
3výs
vý3t
3vý3z
v2ž2
wa4fd
3war
wa4re
we2
2x.
xand4
2xf
xisk4
2xn
3xov
x1t
xt4ra
xy4sm
y1
y2a
y2bl
yb3ri
y2ch
y4chr
y2d1l
yd4lá
y2dr
yd4y.
y2e
y2gr
y3hn
yh4ne
yj4ma
yj4me
y2kl
yk3la
y3klop
yk4ly
ymané4
ym4kl
yna4s
y3ni
ype4r
yp4si
yp4tá
y2p?
yr2v
y2s
y3sa
y3se
y3si
ys3lu
y3sm
y3so
y3sp
ys2t
ys3te
yst4r
y3su
y3sv
y3sy
y3sá
y3sé
y3sí
yt4me
yu3ž
y3vs
yv?4t
y3zb
y3zd
y3zk
y3zn
yz4n?
yz4ní
y3zp
yz4po
y?2k
y2?
y?3b
y?k4n
y?4?e
y3?í
y2š
y3še
y3ši
y3šk
yš1l
y3šo
y3šp
y3šu
y3ší
yž2
y3žd
1z
2z.
zab2l
za4bs
za4dk
za3dl
za4dn
za3h
za3i
za3j
za4jk
za3k
za4kt
zal4k
zam4n
za3p2
za3s2
zat2
za3tl
zat4r
za4ut
za3z
zaz4n
za4zš
za4?.
za3š
zaš4k
za4šs
2zb
zban4
z2by
zbys4
2z1c
2z2d
z3di
zdn?4ní
z4doba
z4dobný
zd4re
zd4ví
z2e
ze3h
ze3p2
4zerot
ze3s2
zes4p
zet2
zev2
ze3vn
ze3z
ze4z.
2z2f
z1há
z4ine
z2j
z3jí
2z2k
z3ka.
z3ky
z3ké
z3k?
z3ký
2zl
3zl.
zlhos4
zlik3
z3ly.
z2m2
2zme
z3mn
z3my
z4m?n
2z2n
3znak
z4nal
z3ne.
z3nic
z3no
z3nu
z3ny
z3né
z3n?
z4n?l
z3ní
z4nít
z4nív
z3ný
zo4tr
zo4šk
2z2p
z3pt
z4pát
3zrak
2z1s2
2zt
ztros3
z4trá
z3t?
3zu.
zu3mo
zu3m?
zu3mí
zu3š
z2v
zva4d
z3va?
z3vi
zvik4
zv4n?
z3vod
z3voj
z4von
zv4ro
z4ván
z4v?s
z3víj
3zy.
2zz
zá1
záh2
zá4kl.
3záp
zá3s2
zá3z
záš2
2z?
z3?l
2z?
z2?
z?ej3
z3?ez
z3?eš
2zš2
z3šk
zš4ka
z3št
2z2ú1
zú3?
zú3ž
z?3s
á1b
á2bl
áb4ry
á4b?.
á3cho
ác3ti3
á1d
á2dl
ádo4s
ádos4ti
ád1?
á1ha
á3he
áh1l
á3hl.
áh3n
á1ho
á1hr
á1há
á1j
á4jmu
áj4m?
á4kli
ák4ni
á1la
á1le
á1lo
á1lu
á1ly
á3lé
á1lí
á3my
á3mé
á1m?
á3mí
á3mý
áne4v
á1ra
á1re
ár2m
á1ro
á1ru
á3r?
á1s
á2sc
á2s3k
ás4k.
ás4kl
ás4kn
á2sla
ás4ly
á2sm
ás4po
á2st
át3k
át1r
á1tu
á1ty
á1tí
á3tý
áv4si
áv4sí
áz3k
áz3ni
ázni4c
áz4vi
á2?
á1?
á?4ke
á?4k?
á2š
á3še
á3ší
2?.
1?a
?a4br
2?b
2?1c
1?e
3?e.
?e1c
?es3k
1?i
2?k
?3ka.
?3ko
?3ku
?3ky
2?1m
2?n
?2ne
1?o
?2p
2?s
?1sk
?s4la
?s4sr
2?2t
?4tené.
?4tený
?t4la
?4tový.
3?tv
4?t?n
?3tí
1?u
1?á
1?í
?ís3l
1??
2?.
1?a
1?o
?s4te
2?1t
3?uj
é1
é2d
é3di
é3do
é2f
é3fo
éf1r
é2kl
é2l
é2m
é3ma
é3me
é3mi
é3mo
é3mu
é3m?
4ére.
é2s
é2t
é3ta
é3to
é3tá
é2š
é2ž
?1c
?d3r
?3ha
?3he
?3hl.
?h3lo
?h3n
?1ho
?3hu
?3h?
?3ja
?1je
?1jo
?3j?
?4klé
?3k2t
?1l
?1ra
?ra3d
?1re
?1ro
?r3s
?rs4t
?1ru
?1ry
?1r?
?s3k
?s3n
?t1a3
?t4ac
?t1l
?1tr
?t3ra
?4traj
?t3v
?1tí
?t3?í
?2v
?3va
?3ve
?3vl
?3vo
?3vu
?3vá
?v3?
?2z
?3ze
?3zi
?z3n
?3zo
?3zí
?1?
?2š
?3še
?3ši
?3šo
?3šu
?3šá
?3ší
?š3?
?š4?s
?2?
?3?o
?2ž
?3že
?3ži
?3žo
?3žu
?3ží
í1b
íb3?
í3cho
ích4t
íd1l
í1h
í2hl
íh3n
í1j
íjed4
íj4m?
í2kr
í1l
í1má
í3mé
í1m?
í1r
í1sa
í2s3k
ís4kl
ís4kn
ís4l.
ís3le
ís4ln
ísáh2
í1t
ít3k
í3t3?e
íz3da
íz3de
íz3k
í3zna
í3z3ni
í3zn?n
í2?
í1?
í2š
í3še
í3ši
í3šo
í3ší
1?
2?.
2?a
?a3d
2?k
2?m
3?ov
?1s
2?1t
ó1
ó2z
ó3za
ó3zi
ó3zo
ó3zy
2?.
?a4pl
?a4?m
2?2b
2?c
2?d
?e3ch
?e4dob
?e1h
?e3jd
?e3kl
?e3kv
?e4k?í
?eo4r
?e3p2
?e4p.
?e4pk
?e4p?
?er4v
2?es
?e3ska
?e3sko
?e2sp
?es3po
?e4sr
?e3sta
?e3stu
?e3stá
?e3st?
?e3tl
?et4?
?e3zd
?e3zk
4?ezl
?e3?t
?i1
?ia3
?i3h
?i4h.
?i4hn
?i4j?
?i4l.
?i4lb
?il2n
4?ine
?is2
3?i4t.
?i4v.
?i4vk
?i4vn
?i3z
?i?4t
?i3?
?i4š.
2?k
?2kl
?k4la
?k4li
?k4ly
?k4no
2?1l
2?1m
2?n
1?o
2?ou
2?2p
2?1s
?s4to
2?1t
?2v
2?z
?á4pl
?á2sl
2?1?
2?íd
?í4k?
?í1s
2?š
?3št
?š4ti
1š
2š.
šab3
ša4vl
2š1c
šej4d
šep3t
ši4mr
2š2k
š3ka
š3ke
š3k3li
4š3kou
4škov
3škr
šk4ro
š3ku.
š3ky
2šl
š2la
š2li
š3liv
š2lo
šlá2
š2lé
š2lý
2š1m
šmi4d
2šn
š2p
2š1s
2št
š4tip
št4ka
št4kl
š4t?k
š2t?s
š4t?v
š4típ
š2v
ší3d
š2?
š3ší
2š2?
š3?o
š3?u
š3?á
1?
2?.
3?al
2?k
2?m
2?t
?á?4k
1ú
ú2c2
ú2d
új4ma
ú2k
ú2l
ú2n
ú2p
ú2t
út4ko
ú2v
ú2z
úz3k
ú2?
3ú?e
ú?e4z
úš4ti
ú2ž
?1b
?1c
?1hl
?3jd
?4jmový
?1le
?1my
?1m?
?1ra
?r4va
?r4vy
?1s2
?2st
?s3te
?s3tán
?t2
?3tkl
?2v
?3va
?3vo
?3v?
?2z
?3zo
?2ž
?3že
?3ži
?3žo
ý1b
ý3cho
ý1d
ýd4la
ý1h
ý1j
ý1l
ý1ml
ý1m?
ý2n
ý3no
ýpo3?4
ý1r
ý1s2
ý2sk
ý1t
ýt4ku
ýt4ky
ý1u
ý4vli
ý3zk
ý3zn
ý4zvu
ý?4n?
ý1?
ýš3l
1ž
2ž.
ža3d
ža4tv
3ža?
2ž1b
2ž1c
2ž1d
že2b3
žeh3n
že4ml
že4zg
ži4dl
ži4jm
3žil
ži2vl
2žk
žk4ni
2žl
ž4lic
3žlo
2ž1m
2žn
žon2
2ž1s2
2ž1t
ž2v
žá4br
žá4nr
2ž?
ží4zn
2ž?
2žš
žš4ti
žš4t?
</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
